Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.018, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Required standard. new text begin (a) new text end "Required standard" meansnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a statewide adopted expectation for student learning in the content areas of language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, physical education, health, and the artsnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) a locally adopted expectation for student learning in healthnew text end . new text begin (b)new text end Locally developed academic standards in health apply until statewide rules implementing statewide health standards under section 120B.021, subdivision 3, are deleted text begin requireddeleted text end new text begin availablenew text end to be implemented in the classroom.new text begin When statewide health standards become available, a school district must determine whether to implement the statewide or locally developed health standards.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required academic standards. (a) The following subject areas are required for statewide accountability: (1) language arts; (2) mathematics, encompassing algebra II, integrated mathematics III, or an equivalent in high school, and to be prepared for the three credits of mathematics in grades 9 through 12, the grade 8 standards include completion of algebra; (3) science, including earth and space science, life science, and the physical sciences, including chemistry and physics; (4) social studies, including history, geography, economics, and government and citizenship that includes civics; (5) physical education; (6) healthnew text begin , for which statewide or locally developed academic standards apply, as determined by the school districtnew text end ; and (7) the arts. Public elementary and middle schools must offer at least three and require at least two of the following five arts areas: dance; media arts; music; theater; and visual arts. Public high schools must offer at least three and require at least one of the following five arts areas: media arts; dance; music; theater; and visual arts. (b) For purposes of applicable federal law, the academic standards for language arts, mathematics, and science apply to all public school students, except the very few students with extreme cognitive or physical impairments for whom an individualized education program team has determined that the required academic standards are inappropriate. An individualized education program team that makes this determination must establish alternative standards. (c) A school district may include child sexual abuse prevention instruction in a health curriculum, consistent with paragraph (a), clause (6). Child sexual abuse prevention instruction may include age-appropriate instruction on recognizing sexual abuse and assault, boundary violations, and ways offenders groom or desensitize victims, as well as strategies to promote disclosure, reduce self-blame, and mobilize bystanders. A school district may provide instruction under this paragraph in a variety of ways, including at an annual assembly or classroom presentation. A school district may also provide parents information on the warning signs of child sexual abuse and available resources. (d) District efforts to develop, implement, or improve instruction or curriculum as a result of the provisions of this section must be consistent with sections 120B.10, 120B.11, and 120B.20. (e) new text begin A school district must implement new text end locally developed academic standards in health deleted text begin applydeleted text end until statewide rules implementing statewide health standards under subdivision 3 are deleted text begin requireddeleted text end new text begin availablenew text end to be implemented in the classroom.new text begin When statewide health standards become available, a school district must determine whether to implement the statewide or locally developed health standards.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Revisions and reviews required. (a) The commissioner of education must revise the state's academic standards and graduation requirements and implement a ten-year cycle to review and, consistent with the review, revise state academic standards and related benchmarks, consistent with this subdivision. During each ten-year review and revision cycle, the commissioner also must examine the alignment of each required academic standard and related benchmark with the knowledge and skills students need for career and college readiness and advanced work in the particular subject area. The commissioner must include the contributions of Minnesota American Indian Tribes and communities, including urban Indigenous communities, as related to the academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards. The commissioner must embed Indigenous education for all students consistent with recommendations from Tribal Nations and urban Indigenous communities in Minnesota regarding the contributions of American Indian Tribes and communities in Minnesota into the state's academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards. The recommendations to embed Indigenous education for all students includes but is not limited to American Indian experiences in Minnesota, including Tribal histories, Indigenous languages, sovereignty issues, cultures, treaty rights, governments, socioeconomic experiences, contemporary issues, and current events. (b) The commissioner must ensure that the statewide mathematics assessments administered to students in grades 3 through 8 and 11 are aligned with the state academic standards in mathematics, consistent with section 120B.302, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in mathematics beginning in the 2021-2022 school year and every ten years thereafter. (c) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in arts beginning in the 2017-2018 school year and every ten years thereafter. (d) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in science beginning in the 2018-2019 school year and every ten years thereafter. (e) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in language arts beginning in the 2019-2020 school year and every ten years thereafter. (f) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in social studies beginning in the 2020-2021 school year and every ten years thereafter. (g) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in physical education beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and every ten years thereafter. (h) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in health education beginning in the 2034-2035 school year and every ten years thereafter. (i) School districts and charter schools must revise and align local academic standards and high school graduation requirements in world languages and career and technical education to require students to complete the revised standards beginning in a school year determined by the school district or charter school. School districts and charter schools must formally establish a periodic review cycle for the academic standards and related benchmarks in world languages and career and technical education.new text begin School districts and charter schools implementing local standards in health education must revise and align the local standards and high school graduation requirements in health education to require students to complete the revised standards in a school year determined by the school district or charter school, and must formally establish a periodic review cycle for the health standards and related benchmarks.new text end (j) The commissioner of education must embed technology and information literacy standards consistent with recommendations from school media specialists into the state's academic standards and graduation requirements. (k) The commissioner of education must embed ethnic studies as related to the academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.024, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Graduation requirements. (a) Students must successfully complete the following high school level credits for graduation: (1) four credits of language arts sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in English language arts; (2) three credits of mathematics sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in mathematics; (3) three credits of science, including one credit to satisfy all the earth and space science standards for grades 9 through 12, one credit to satisfy all the life science standards for grades 9 through 12, and one credit to satisfy all the chemistry or physics standards for grades 9 through 12; (4) three and one-half credits of social studies, including credit for a course in government and citizenship in either grade 11 or 12 for students beginning grade 9 in the 2025-2026 school year and later or an advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other rigorous course on government and citizenship under section 120B.021, subdivision 1a, and a combination of other credits encompassing at least United States history, geography, government and citizenship, world history, and economics sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in social studies; (5) one credit of the arts sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in the arts; (6) credit sufficient to satisfy the state standards in physical education; (7) credits sufficient to satisfy new text begin either locally adopted standards in health education or new text end the state standards in health upon adoption of statewide rules for implementing health standards under section 120B.021; and (8) a minimum of seven elective credits. (b) Students who begin grade 9 in the 2024-2025 school year and later must successfully complete a course for credit in personal finance in grade 10, 11, or 12. A teacher of a personal finance course that satisfies the graduation requirement must have a field license or out-of-field permission in agricultural education, business, family and consumer science, social studies, or math. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end